Hawaii statutes.
§53-7 Urban renewal projects in disaster
areas. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, where the
council of a county certifies that an area within the county is in need of
renewal, redevelopment, or rehabilitation as a result of a seismic wave, flood,
fire, hurricane, earthquake, storm, volcanic activity, explosion, or other
catastrophe, natural or of human origin (herein called "disaster
area") respecting which the governor of the State has certified the need
for disaster assistance under Public Law 875, Eighty-first Congress (64 Stat.
1109), or other federal law, the council of a county may approve an urban
renewal plan and an urban renewal project with respect to the area without
regard to:

(1) The provisions of this chapter as follows: the
definitions of "redevelopment area" and "urban area" in
section 53-1; the proviso of the first sentence of paragraph (4) of section
53-5; the requirements for housing of displaced families, approval of the plan
by planning commission, public hearings and findings required by the county
council prior to the approval of the plan as contained in section 53-6,
provided that the limitation of time in which to contest validity of the
proceedings or of the renewal plan provided in section 53-6 in the case of an
urban renewal project for disaster areas shall be twenty days instead of thirty
days; the exceptions set forth in the second sentence of section 53-20; the
proviso of the second sentence of section 53-21; and

(2) Any of the provisions of this chapter requiring
public hearings or requiring that the urban renewal plan conform to the master
plan for the development of the county or locality as a whole, or that the
urban renewal area be a slum area, or a blighted, deteriorated, or
deteriorating area, or that the urban renewal area be predominantly residential
in character or be developed or redeveloped for residential use.

In the preparation, planning, financing,
acquisition, and disposal of real property, and the execution generally of an
urban renewal project for disaster areas, a redevelopment agency shall have all
of the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities conferred upon the agency by
this chapter including any amendment thereof or addition thereto, or by any
other law, in the same manner as though all provisions of law relating to urban
renewal projects were applicable to the redevelopment and renewal of the
disaster areas as in this section provided, subject to the exceptions
hereinabove set forth. [L Sp 1960, c 5, §1; Supp, §143-7.1; HRS §53-7; am L
1987, c 283, §5; am L 1999, c 18, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next